Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.100

Issuance of license—Expiration date—Fraudulent application grounds for refusal, revocation.

The director, upon his or her satisfaction that the applicant has met the requirements of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted hereunder, shall issue a license entitling the applicant to carry on the business described on the application. Such license shall expire on December 31st following the issuance of the license, provided that it has not been revoked or suspended prior thereto, by the director, after due notice and hearing. Fraud and misrepresentation in making an application for a license shall be cause for refusal to grant a license or revocation of license granted pursuant to a fraudulent application after due notice and hearing.

[ 2011 c 336 s 571; 1959 c 139 s 10.]